Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5940YH (2) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2552 Section 1. Section 135.61, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. âCancer care providerâ means any of the 3 following: 4 a. An outpatient oncology clinic. 5 b. A radiation therapy center. 6 c. A chemotherapy infusion center. 7 d. An outpatient cancer diagnostic facility. 8 e. An oncology surgical center. 9 f. An ancillary support service directly related to cancer 10 treatment. 11 Sec. 2. Section 135.62, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. This subchapter shall not apply to a 14 cancer care provider. 15